Utah statutes.
55-12-108.   Article 8 -- Finance.

(1)  The Interstate Commission shall pay or provide for the payment of the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.

(2)  The commission shall levy on and collect an annual assessment from each compacting state to cover the cost of the internal operations and activities of the commission and its staff which shall be in a total amount sufficient to cover the commission's annual budget as approved each year.  The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the commission, taking into consideration the population of each compacting state and the volume of interstate movement of juveniles in each compacting state.  The commission shall promulgate a rule binding upon all compacting states which governs the assessment.

(3)  The commission may not incur any obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the obligations, nor shall the commission pledge the credit of any of the compacting states, except by and with the authority of the compacting state.

(4)  The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements.  The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its by-laws.  All receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the commission.



Enacted by Chapter 155, 2005 General Session

